Massachusetts, session 194th, S1107.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 10 of chapter 218 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended, in line 129, by inserting after the words "district court of Springfield;" the 
following:- "central district court of northern Essex;".